Utah statutes.
73-10-1.5.   Board of Water Resources -- Creation -- Transfer of powers and
duties.
There is created within the Department of Natural Resources a Board of Water
Resources which, except as otherwise provided in this act, shall assume all of
the policy-making functions, powers, duties, rights and responsibilities of
the Utah water and power board, together with all functions, powers, duties,
rights and responsibilities granted to the Board of Water Resources by this
act. The Board of Water Resources shall be the policy-making body of the
Division of Water Resources. Except as otherwise provided in this act,
whenever reference is made in Title 73, or any other provision of law, to the
Utah Water and Power Board, it shall be construed as referring to the Board of
Water Resources where such reference pertains to policy-making functions,
powers, duties, rights and responsibilities; but in all other instances such
reference shall be construed as referring to the Division of Water Resources.
